California, session 20252026, AB2059.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21081.4 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21081.4. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Demonstrated evacuation need” means a project is necessary to increase the capacity and speed of traffic flow during emergency evacuations, to implement physical or operational improvements to reduce fatalities and injuries during a disaster, to provide safe evacuation options for individuals with access or functional needs, to ensure a transportation facility remains functional during disasters, or to provide alternative routes, particularly in rural or high-vulnerability areas. that is specifically identified as necessary to provide evacuation capacity for the affected area in an adopted local hazard mitigation plan, general plan safety element, local emergency operations plan, or other local or regional emergency evacuation plan approved by a city, county, or regional planning agency through a public process.(2) “Demonstrated safety need” means a project is for which the lead agency demonstrates, through documented collision, injury, or fatality data specific to the project location, or through a risk-based or systemic safety analysis consistent with state and federal guidance, that the proposed project includes safety countermeasures that are necessary to reduce the number and severity of collisions, to upgrade infrastructure to meet current, safer design standards, or to improve safety for all users, injuries or the number of fatalities, including reducing specific risks to vulnerable road users.(3)“Estimated total project cost” means the total capital construction cost of the transportation project, as estimated for purposes of the environmental review document prepared pursuant to this division.(4)“Rural county” means a county with a population of less than 200,000 persons, as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent population estimates published by the Department of Finance.(3) “Nonmetropolitan county” means a nonmetropolitan county designated by the Methodology for Determining Rural Status of Project Site for 2025 Applications issued by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee on January 1, 2025.(5)(4) “Transportation project” means a project undertaken by a public agency that consists of the planning, design, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, expansion, or operation of a highway, road, bridge, transit facility, rail facility, bicycle or pedestrian facility, or other public transportation infrastructure.(b)(1)Notwithstanding any other law, for a transportation project located within a rural county, the total cost of mitigation measures required to address a significant transportation impact as determined by the vehicle miles traveled metric developed pursuant to Section 21099 shall not exceed 5 percent of the estimated total project cost.(2)Any mitigation measure required to mitigated a significant transportation impact as determined by the vehicle miles traveled metric developed pursuant to Section 21099 that exceeds the limitation established in paragraph (1) shall be deemed economically infeasible for purposes of this division.(b) A transportation project is presumed to have a less than significant transportation impact as determined by the vehicle-miles-traveled metric developed pursuant to Section 21099 if at least 80 percent of the project lies within one or more nonmetropolitan counties.(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply to a transportation project that adds one or more general purpose lanes to the state highway system unless there is a demonstrated safety or evacuation need for the project.(d)This section does not prohibit a lead agency from approving a project with significant and unavoidable impacts pursuant to Section 21081, if the agency adopts a statement of overriding considerations pursuant to Section 21081 and subdivision (b) of Section 15093 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.